Washington statutes.
RCW 19.120.020

Sale of franchise to third party.

Notwithstanding the terms of any motor fuel franchise, a motor fuel refiner-supplier shall not absolutely prohibit or unreasonably withhold its consent to any sale, assignment, or other transfer of the motor fuel franchise by a motor fuel retailer to a third party without fairly compensating the motor fuel retailer for the fair market value, at the time of expiration of the franchise, of the motor fuel retailer's inventory, supplies, equipment, and furnishings purchased from the motor fuel refiner-supplier, and good will, exclusive of personalized materials which have no value to the motor fuel refiner-supplier, and inventory, supplies, equipment, and furnishings not reasonably required in the conduct of the franchise business. A motor fuel refiner-supplier may offset against amounts owed to a motor fuel retailer under this section any amounts owed by the motor fuel retailer to the motor fuel refiner-supplier.

[ 1986 c 320 s 3.]